South Dakota, session 2026, HB1299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-18:
A lodging establishment that has fifteen or fewer sleeping rooms may apply to the
department for a permit to use a biological filtration system to filter water in the
establishment's water recreational facility. Only an establishment that has been issued a
permit under this section may use a biological filtration system in a water recreational
facility. A permit issued under this section is valid for one year.
A water recreational facility that uses a biological filtration system must otherwise
meet the minimum public health and safety requirements for a water recreational facility,
established by the department pursuant to § 34-18-22.
When applying for a permit, an establishment shall submit to the department a
document that demonstrates how the proposed system meets water quality outcomes
established by the department.
A biological filtration system must be inspected by the department every year. If a
lodging establishment fails an inspection, the department must revoke the permit. An
establishment that fails an inspection may not reapply for a permit under this section for
one year.
The department shall promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 1-26 to establish:
(1) Application requirements for a permit to use a biological filtration system;
(2) Procedures for reapplying for a permit following a failed inspection;
(3) Requirements for the routine maintenance of a biological filtration system by a
lodging establishment;
(4) The permit fee, which may not exceed fifty dollars; and
(5) Water quality testing procedures for biological filtration systems.

26.775.10 2 1299
For purposes of this section, "biological filtration system" means a system that is
approved by the department and filters water using natural processes, including the use
of plants, beneficial bacteria, and microbes, and does not rely on continuous chemical
disinfectant residuals.
HB1299 ENROLLED

26.775.10 3 1299
An Act to permit the use of biological filtration systems in water recreational facilities located
in certain lodging establishments.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1299
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1299 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1299 ENROLLED